South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Election of trustees SECTION 1.    SECTION 13A. (B)(1) of Act 509 of 1982, as last amended by Act 232 of 2024, is amended to read: (B)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the seven-member governing body of Anderson County School District 2 must be elected as follows: (a) one member each from Districts 2, 5, and 6 must be elected from each respective single-member district beginning with school trustee elections in 2028; (b) one member each from Districts 1, 3, and 4 must be elected from each respective single-member district beginning with school trustee elections in 2026; and (c) one member elected from Anderson County School District 2 at large. A candidate for a numbered district seat must reside in, and be elected by the qualified electors of, the district for which the candidate files for election. Each of the seven members must be elected to four-year terms with the winners from each numbered district seat and the at-large seat determined by plurality vote. The numbered districts are defined on map number S-07-02-24 as maintained in the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. -- L. ----XX----